Vermont, session 2025-2026, S177.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 10 V.S.A. chapter 169 is added to read:
CHAPTER 169. COLLECTION AND RECYCLING
OF WASTE MOTOR VEHICLE TIRES
Subchapter 1. Definitions
§ 7601. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
(1) “Agency” means the Agency of Natural Resources.
(2) “Brand” means a name, symbol, word, or traceable mark
that identifies a motor vehicle tire and attributes the motor vehicle tire to the
owner or licensee of the brand as the manufacturer.
VT LEG #385841 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.177
2026 Page 2 of 33
(3) “Collection rate” means a percentage of the number of waste tires
that each manufacturer or waste tire stewardship organization collects by an
established date. The collection rate is calculated by dividing the total number
of the waste tires that are collected during a calendar year by the average
number of motor vehicle tires that were estimated to have been sold in the
State by participating manufacturers during the previous three calendar years.
Estimates of motor vehicle tires sold in the State may be based on a reasonable
pro rata calculation based on national sales.
(4) “Covered entity” means any person that presents or delivers any
number of waste tires to a collection facility that is included in an approved
waste tire stewardship plan.
(5) “Legacy waste tire pile” means an accumulation of 50 or more waste
tires, whether or not they are lying upon another, that:
(A) is located on a parcel of real property, other than a parcel used by
a person engaged in farming, as that term is defined in section 6001 of this
title, when the person engaged in farming has sliced the tires to prevent the
holding of water and the sliced tires are currently in use annually for the
practice of holding down silage bunkers; and
(B) is not enclosed by a building.
VT LEG #385841 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.177
2026 Page 3 of 33
(6) “Manufacturer” means a person that:
(A) manufactures or manufactured a motor vehicle tire under the
person’s own brand or label for sale in the State;
(B) sells in the State under its own brand or label a motor vehicle tire
produced by another supplier;
(C) owns a brand that the person licenses or licensed to another
person for use on a motor vehicle tire sold in the State;
(D) imports into the United States for sale in the State a motor
vehicle tire manufactured by a person without a presence in the United States;
(E) manufactures a motor vehicle tire for sale in the State without
affixing a brand name; or
(F) assumes the responsibilities, obligations, and liabilities of a
manufacturer as defined under subdivisions (A) through (E) of this subdivision
(6), provided that the Secretary may enforce the requirements of this chapter
against a manufacturer as defined under subdivisions (A) through (E) of this
subdivision (6) if a person that assumes the manufacturer’s responsibilities
fails to comply with the requirements of this chapter.
(7) “Motorized electric-powered bicycle or tricycle” means a bicycle or
tricycle that is equipped with an assistance motor that has a maximum piston
displacement of 48 cubic centimeters or less, that may also be self-propelled,
and that is operated at speeds of less than 20 miles per hour.
VT LEG #385841 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.177
2026 Page 4 of 33
(8) “Motor vehicle” means all vehicles operated in the State that are
propelled or drawn by power other than muscular power.
(A) “Motor vehicle” includes:
(i) “all-terrain vehicles,” which has the same meaning as in
23 V.S.A. § 3501(1);
(ii) “motorcycles,” which has the same meaning as in 23 V.S.A.
§ 4(18);
(iii) farm tractors and farm trailers; and
(iv) “motor-driven cycles,” which has the same meaning as in
23 V.S.A. § 4(45)(A).
(B) “Motor vehicle” does not mean:
(i) an “electric personal assistive mobility device,” which has the
same meaning as in 23 V.S.A. § 4(66);
(ii) an “electric bicycle,” which has the same meaning as in
23 V.S.A. § 4(46)(A);
(iii) a “motor-assisted bicycle,” which has the same meaning as in
23 V.S.A. § 4(45)(B)(i), or a motor-assisted bicycle that has been modified to
meet the physical needs or abilities of the operator or a passenger;
(iv) an “adaptive electric cycle,” which has the same meaning as
in 19 V.S.A. § 2901;
VT LEG #385841 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.177
2026 Page 5 of 33
(v) a lawn mower; or
(vi) a specialized construction vehicle, such as motorized highway
building equipment, a road-making appliance, a tracked vehicle, or an aircraft
pushback tractor.
(9) “Motor vehicle tire” means a tire designed for on-road use on a
motor vehicle.
(10) “Retailer” means a person that sells a motor vehicle tire to a person
in the State through any means, including a sales outlet, a catalogue, the
telephone, the internet, or any electronic means.
(11) “Secretary” means the Secretary of Natural Resources.
(12) “Sell” or “sale” means any transfer to a person for consideration of
title or of the right of a person to use by lease or sales contract a motor vehicle
tire in the State of Vermont. “Sell” or “sale” does not include the sale, resale,
lease, or transfer of a used motor vehicle tire or a manufacturer’s or a
distributor’s wholesale transaction with a distributor or a retailer.
(13) “Tire” means a continuous solid or pneumatic rubber covering
encircling the wheel of a motor vehicle.
(14) “Waste tire” means a motor vehicle tire that has been removed
from a motor vehicle and is no longer suitable for its original purpose because
of wear, tear, damage, defect, or another reason.
VT LEG #385841 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.177
2026 Page 6 of 33
(15) “Waste tire stewardship organization” or “stewardship
organization” means an organization appointed by one or more manufacturers
to act as an agency on behalf of a manufacturer or manufacturers to design,
submit, implement, and administer a waste tire stewardship plan under this
chapter.
Subchapter 2. Waste Tire Stewardship Program
§ 7604. SALE OF MOTOR VEHICLE TIRES; STEWARDSHIP
ORGANIZATION REGISTRATION
Sale prohibited. Beginning on January 1, 2028, except as set forth under
section 7609 of this title, a manufacturer of a motor vehicle tire shall not sell,
offer for sale, or deliver to a retailer for subsequent sale a motor vehicle tire
unless all the following have been met:
(1) The manufacturer is:
(A) implementing an approved waste tire stewardship plan; or
(B) participating in a waste tire stewardship organization that is
registered with the Secretary and that is implementing an approved waste tire
stewardship plan.
(2) The manufacturer or waste tire stewardship organization has paid the
fee under section 7620 of this title.
VT LEG #385841 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.177
2026 Page 7 of 33
(3) The name of the manufacturer and the manufacturer’s brands are
designated on the Agency website as covered by an approved waste tire
stewardship plan.
§ 7605. REGISTRATION OF MANUFACTURER OR WASTE TIRE
STEWARDSHIP ORGANIZATION
(a) Manufacturer registration requirements. On or before July 1, 2027, and
annually thereafter, a manufacturer of motor vehicle tires sold or offered for
sale in the State shall register with the Secretary.
(b) Waste tire stewardship organization registration. A manufacturer of
motor vehicle tires may meet the requirements of this chapter by participating
in a waste tire stewardship organization that registers with the Secretary on or
before July 1, 2027, and annually thereafter, and that meets the requirements of
section 7606 of this title.
(c) Registration form. The Secretary shall provide the registration form to
the manufacturer or waste tire stewardship organization. The registration form
shall include:
(1) for a manufacturer registering independently:
(A) a list of the manufacturer’s brands offered for sale in the
State; and
(B) the name, address, and contact information of a person
responsible for ensuring the manufacturer’s compliance with this chapter; and
VT LEG #385841 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.177
2026 Page 8 of 33
(2) for a waste tire stewardship organization:
(A) a list of the manufacturers participating in the waste tire
stewardship organization;
(B) the name, address, and contact information of a person
responsible for ensuring each participating manufacturer’s compliance with
this chapter;
(C) a description of how the waste tire stewardship organization
meets the requirements of sections 7604, 7607, and 7608 of this title for
manufacturers, including any reasonable requirements for participation in the
waste tire stewardship organization; and
(D) the name, address, and contact information of a person whom a
nonmember manufacturer can contact regarding how to participate in the waste
tire stewardship organization as a method of satisfying the requirements of this
chapter.
(d) Renewal of registration. A manufacturer or waste tire stewardship
organization may renew a registration without changes by notifying the
Agency of Natural Resources on a form provided by the Secretary.
VT LEG #385841 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.177
2026 Page 9 of 33
§ 7606. WASTE TIRE STEWARDSHIP ORGANIZATIONS;
REQUIREMENTS
Qualifications for a waste tire stewardship organization. To qualify as a
waste tire stewardship organization under this chapter, a stewardship
organization shall:
(1) commit to assume the responsibilities, obligations, and liabilities of
the manufacturers participating in the waste tire stewardship organization;
(2) not create unreasonable barriers for participation by manufacturers in
the waste tire stewardship organization;
(3) maintain a public website that lists all manufacturers and
manufacturers’ brands covered by the waste tire stewardship organization’s
approved waste tire stewardship plan; and
(4) register with the Secretary as required under section 7605 of
this title.
§ 7607. WASTE TIRE STEWARDSHIP PLANS
(a) Stewardship plan required. On or before October 1, 2027, each
manufacturer selling, offering for sale, distributing, or offering for promotional
purposes a motor vehicle tire in the State shall individually or as part of a
waste tire stewardship organization submit a waste tire stewardship plan to the
Secretary for review.
VT LEG #385841 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.177
2026 Page 10 of 33
(b) Waste tire stewardship plan; minimum requirements. Each waste tire
stewardship plan shall include, at a minimum, all of the following elements:
(1) List of manufacturers and brands. Each waste tire stewardship plan
shall list:
(A) all participating manufacturers and contact information for each
of the participating manufacturers; and
(B) the brands of motor vehicle tires covered by the stewardship plan.
(2) Free collection of waste tires. Each waste tire stewardship plan shall
provide for the collection of waste tires from covered entities at no cost to
covered entities. A manufacturer shall not refuse the collection of a waste tire
based on the brand or manufacturer of the motor vehicle tire.
(3) Convenient collection location. Each waste tire stewardship
plan shall:
(A) Provide for notification of all retailers of the opportunity to
participate at no cost as a collection location under the plan.
(B) Allow all retailers that meet the requirements specified in the
plan, all municipalities, and all certified solid waste management facilities to
opt to be a collection facility under the plan at no cost to the retailer,
municipality, or certified solid waste management facility.
VT LEG #385841 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.177
2026 Page 11 of 33
(C) Provide, at a minimum, in each county of the State not fewer than
two collection facilities that provide for the collection of waste tires throughout
the year. All collection facilities shall be specified in the plan.
(D) Provide for the acceptance from a covered entity of up to 12
waste tires per visit. A collection facility may agree to accept more than 12
waste tires per visit.
(4) Legacy waste tire pile response. Each waste tire stewardship plan
shall include a proposed method of collecting tires from or eliminating legacy
waste tire piles in the State. Proposed methods may include financial
payments to property owners, bounties on collection, or other incentives.
(5) Collection rate. Each waste tire stewardship plan shall include a
collection rate performance goal approved by the Secretary. In the first year of
the plan, manufacturers shall have a collection rate performance goal of 50
percent of the participating manufacturer’s motor vehicle tires sold, by unit, in
the State in the previous calendar year.
(6) Method of disposition. Each waste tire stewardship plan shall
include a description of the method that will be used to manage waste tires
responsibly. A manufacturer or waste tire stewardship organization shall
recycle or reuse at least 50 percent of collected waste tires, provided that the
use of waste tires as tire-derived fuel shall not be considered reuse or
recycling.
VT LEG #385841 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.177
2026 Page 12 of 33
(7) Education and outreach. Each waste tire stewardship plan shall
include an education and outreach program that may include media
advertising, retail displays, articles in publications, and other public
educational efforts. At a minimum, the education and outreach program shall
notify the public of the following:
(A) that there is a free collection program for waste tires;
(B) the location of collection points for waste tires and how a covered
entity can access the collection program; and
(C) the opportunity for retailers, manufacturers, and certified solid
waste management facilities to participate in a waste tire stewardship plan at
no cost.
(8) Compliance with appropriate environmental standards. In
implementing a waste tire stewardship plan, a manufacturer shall comply with
all applicable laws related to the collection, transportation, and disposal of
waste tires.
(9) Reimbursement. A waste tire stewardship plan shall include
a reimbursement procedure that is consistent with the requirements of
subchapter 3 of this chapter.
(c) Implementation. A manufacturer or a waste tire stewardship
organization shall include provisions in the waste tire stewardship plan for the
implementation of the program in conjunction with those retailers,
VT LEG #385841 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.177
2026 Page 13 of 33
municipalities, and certified solid waste management facilities acting as
collection facilities under a program. A manufacturer or waste tire stewardship
organization shall not impose transportation or recycling costs on retailers,
municipalities, or certified solid waste management facilities acting as
collection facilities under a program. A manufacturer or waste tire stewardship
organization shall provide retailers, municipalities, and certified solid waste
management facilities acting as collection facilities with products or equipment
for setting up a collection point and for providing for the pickup of collected
waste tires, including arranging for the management of those waste tires.
(d) Term of waste tire stewardship plan. A stewardship plan approved by
the Secretary under section 7610 of this title shall have a term not to exceed
five years, provided that the manufacturer remains in compliance with the
requirements of this chapter and the terms of the approved plan.
§ 7608. ANNUAL REPORT; PLAN AUDIT
(a) Annual report. On or before March 1, 2029, and annually thereafter, a
manufacturer of motor vehicle tires or a waste tire stewardship organization
representing manufacturers of motor vehicle tires shall submit a report to the
Secretary that contains the following:
(1) the estimated total number of motor vehicle tires sold in the State in
the previous calendar year;
VT LEG #385841 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.177
2026 Page 14 of 33
(2) the number of waste tires collected by the manufacturer or the waste
tire stewardship organization in the prior calendar year;
(3) the collection rate achieved in the prior calendar year under the
waste tire stewardship plan;
(4) the locations for all collection points set up by the manufacturer or
the waste tire stewardship organization and contact information for each
location;
(5) examples and a description of the educational materials used to
increase collection;
(6) the manner in which the collected waste tires were managed,
including:
(A) the number of waste tires collected from legacy waste tire piles;
(B) the number of collected waste tires recycled or reused; and
(C) the number of collected waste tires disposed of as tire-derived
fuel or otherwise incinerated;
(7) any material change to the waste tire stewardship plan approved by
the Secretary under section 7610 of this title; and
(8) the cost of implementation of the waste tire stewardship plan,
including the costs of collection, recycling, education, and outreach.
(b) Plan audit. Beginning on January 1, 2033, and every five years
thereafter, a manufacturer or waste tire stewardship organization shall hire an
VT LEG #385841 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.177
2026 Page 15 of 33
independent third party to audit the plan and plan operation. The auditor shall
examine the effectiveness of the plan in collecting and disposing of waste tires.
The auditor shall examine the cost-effectiveness of the plan and compare it to
that of waste tire stewardship plans in other jurisdictions. The auditor shall
make recommendations to the Secretary on ways to increase the efficacy and
cost-effectiveness of the waste tire stewardship plan.
§ 7609. NEW MANUFACTURERS; SMALL MANUFACTURERS
(a) New manufacturers.
(1) A manufacturer of a motor vehicle tire that, after January 1, 2028,
seeks to sell, offer for sale, or offer for promotional purposes in the State a
motor vehicle tire not previously sold in the State shall notify the Secretary
prior to selling or offering for sale or promotion a motor vehicle tire not
covered by an approved waste tire stewardship plan.
(2) The Secretary shall list a manufacturer that supplies notice under this
subsection as a “new manufacturer” on the Agency’s website. A manufacturer
that supplies notice under this subsection shall have 90 days, not including the
time required for public comment under subsection 7610(d) of this title, to
either join an existing waste tire stewardship organization or submit a waste
tire stewardship plan for approval to the Secretary.
VT LEG #385841 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.177
2026 Page 16 of 33
(b) Small manufacturers. A manufacturer that annually sells, offers for
sale, or distributes in or imports into the State motor vehicles with a total retail
value of less than $5,000.00 is exempt from the requirements of this chapter.
§ 7610. AGENCY RESPONSIBILITIES
(a) Review and approval of stewardship plans. The Secretary shall review
and approve or deny waste tire stewardship plans submitted under section 7607
of this title. The Secretary shall approve a waste tire stewardship plan if the
Secretary finds that the plan:
(1) complies with the requirements of subsection 7607(b) of this title;
(2) provides adequate notice to the public of the collection opportunities
available for waste tires;
(3) ensures that the collection of waste tires will occur in an
environmentally sound fashion that is consistent with the law; and
(4) promotes the collection and disposal of waste tires.
(b) Assessment of performance. The Secretary shall assess each
manufacturer’s or waste tire stewardship organization’s performance under an
approved waste tire stewardship plan, including whether a manufacturer or
waste tire stewardship organization achieved the collection rate performance
goal for the year. If a manufacturer or waste tire stewardship organization fails
to achieve its collection rate performance goal, the Secretary shall impose a
penalty under section 7612 of this title.
VT LEG #385841 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.177
2026 Page 17 of 33
(c) Plan amendment. The Secretary, in the Secretary’s discretion or at the
request of a manufacturer or a waste tire stewardship organization, may require
a manufacturer or a stewardship organization to amend an approved plan. The
Secretary shall subject all plan amendments to the public input provisions of
subsection (d) of this section.
(d) Public input. Approval of or amendment to the waste tire stewardship
plan shall be subject to the public input provisions of section 7714 of this title.
(e) Registrations. The Secretary shall accept, review, and approve or deny
the manufacturer registrations or the waste tire stewardship organization
registrations required by this chapter. The Secretary may revoke a registration
of a manufacturer or a waste tire stewardship organization for actions that are
unreasonable, unnecessary, or contrary to the requirements or the policy of this
chapter.
(f) Supervisory capacity. The Secretary shall act in a supervisory capacity
over the actions of a manufacturer or a waste tire stewardship organization
registered under this chapter. In acting in this capacity, the Secretary shall
review the actions of the manufacturer or the waste tire stewardship
organization to ensure that they are reasonable, necessary, and limited to
carrying out the requirements of and the policy established by this chapter.
VT LEG #385841 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.177
2026 Page 18 of 33
(g) Special handling requirements. The Secretary may adopt, by rule,
special handling requirements for the collection, transport, and disposal of
waste tires.
(h) Approved plans; internet posting. The Secretary shall post on the
Agency website the names of all manufacturers and manufacturers’ brands that
are covered under an approved waste tire stewardship plan. For waste tire
stewardship organizations, the Secretary may link to the list of manufacturers
and manufacturers’ brands on the waste tire stewardship organization’s
website.
§ 7611. RETAILER OBLIGATIONS
(a) Sale prohibited. Except as set forth under subsection (b) of this section,
beginning on January 1, 2028, no retailer shall sell or offer for sale a motor
vehicle tire unless the producer of the motor vehicle tire is implementing an
approved stewardship plan, is a member of a stewardship organization that is
implementing an approved stewardship plan, or is exempt from participation in
a plan.
(b) Inventory exception; expiration or revocation of manufacturer
registration. A retailer shall not be responsible for an unlawful sale of a motor
vehicle tire under subsection (a) of this section if:
(1) the retailer purchased the motor vehicle tire prior to January 1,
2028; or
VT LEG #385841 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.177
2026 Page 19 of 33
(2) the manufacturer’s waste tire stewardship plan expired or was
revoked, and the retailer took possession of the in-store inventory of motor
vehicle tires prior to the expiration or revocation of the manufacturer’s waste
tire stewardship plan.
(c) Educational material. A manufacturer or waste tire stewardship
organization supplying motor vehicle tires to a retailer shall provide the retailer
with educational materials describing collection opportunities for waste tires.
The retailer shall make the educational materials available to covered entities.
§ 7612. PENALTIES FOR FAILURE TO ACHIEVE COLLECTION
PERFORMANCE GOAL
(a) Assessment of penalty. The Secretary shall assess a penalty against a
manufacturer or waste tire stewardship organization that fails to achieve the
collection rate performance goal in its waste tire stewardship plan.
(b) Amount of penalty. The Secretary shall assess a penalty under this
section as follows:
(1) If the manufacturer achieved less than 50 percent of the collection
rate performance goal, the manufacturer shall pay a penalty of $1.00 per tire
difference between the collection rate performance goal and the actual number
of waste tires collected in the calendar year.
(2) If the manufacturer achieved 50 percent or greater of the collection
rate performance goal, the manufacturer shall pay a penalty of $0.50 per tire
VT LEG #385841 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.177
2026 Page 20 of 33
difference between the collection rate performance goal and the actual number
of waste tires collected in the calendar year.
(c) Disposition of penalties. The Secretary shall deposit penalties collected
under this section in the Solid Waste Management Assistance Account of the
Waste Management Assistance Fund for the proper disposal of waste tires as
provided for in subdivision 6618(b)(10) of this title, including the elimination
of legacy waste tire piles.
Subchapter 3. Reimbursement and Cost Recovery
§ 7614. REIMBURSEMENT; AUTHORIZATION
(a) Reimbursement of motor vehicle tire manufacturers.
(1) A manufacturer or a waste tire stewardship organization operating
under an approved waste tire stewardship plan that collects waste tires that are
not listed under its approved waste tire stewardship plan is entitled to
reimbursement from the manufacturer of the collected waste tires or the waste
tire stewardship organization representing the manufacturer of the collected
waste tires of reimbursable costs per tire incurred in collecting the waste tires.
(2) Reimbursement may be requested by a collecting manufacturer or
waste tire stewardship organization only after that manufacturer or stewardship
organization has achieved the collection rate performance goal approved by the
Secretary under section 7607 of this title.
VT LEG #385841 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.177
2026 Page 21 of 33
(b) Reimbursable costs. Under this subchapter, a manufacturer or a waste
tire stewardship organization may seek reimbursement only for those costs
incurred in collecting the waste tires subject to the reimbursement request.
Reimbursable costs include:
(1) costs of collection, transport, recycling, and other methods of
disposition identified in an approved waste tire stewardship plan; and
(2) reasonable educational, promotional, or administrative costs.
§ 7615. REIMBURSEMENT PROCESS
(a) Reimbursement request.
(1) A manufacturer or waste tire stewardship organization that incurs
reimbursable costs under section 7614 of this title shall submit a request to the
manufacturer of the collected waste tire or the waste tire stewardship
organization in which the manufacturer of the collected waste tire is
participating.
(2) A manufacturer or waste tire stewardship organization that receives
a request for reimbursement may, prior to payment and within 30 days after
receipt of the request for reimbursement, request an independent audit of
submitted reimbursement costs.
(3) The independent auditor shall verify the reasonableness of the
reimbursement request, including the costs sought for reimbursement, the
VT LEG #385841 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.177
2026 Page 22 of 33
amount of reimbursement, and the reimbursable costs assessed by each of the
two programs.
(4) If the independent audit confirms the reasonableness of the
reimbursement request, the manufacturer or waste tire stewardship
organization requesting the audit shall pay the cost of the audit and the amount
of the reimbursement calculated by the independent auditor. If the
independent audit indicates that the reimbursement request was not reasonable,
the manufacturer or waste tire stewardship organization that initiated the
reimbursement request shall pay the cost of the audit and the amount of the
reimbursement calculated by the independent auditor.
(b) Role of Agency. The Agency shall not provide assistance or otherwise
participate in a reimbursement request, audit, or other action under this section,
unless subject to subpoena before a court of jurisdiction.
§ 7616. PRIVATE RIGHT OF ACTION
(a) Action against manufacturer with no waste tire stewardship plan. A
manufacturer or waste tire stewardship organization implementing an approved
waste tire stewardship plan in compliance with the requirements of this chapter
may bring a civil action against another manufacturer or waste tire stewardship
organization for damages when:
(1) the plaintiff manufacturer or waste tire stewardship organization
incurs more than $1,000.00 in actual reimbursable costs collecting, handling,
VT LEG #385841 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.177
2026 Page 23 of 33
recycling, or properly disposing of waste tires that were sold or offered for sale
in the State by that other manufacturer; and
(2) the manufacturer from which damages are sought:
(A) can be identified as the manufacturer of the collected waste tires
from a brand or marking on the waste tire or from other information available
to the plaintiff manufacturer or waste tire stewardship organization; and
(B) does not operate or participate in an approved waste tire
stewardship organization in the State or is not otherwise in compliance with
the requirements of this chapter.
(b) Action against manufacturer with an approved waste tire stewardship
plan. A manufacturer or waste tire stewardship organization in compliance
with the requirements of this chapter may bring a civil action for damages
against a manufacturer or waste tire stewardship organization in the State that
is in compliance with the requirements of this chapter, provided that:
(1) a plaintiff manufacturer or waste tire stewardship organization
submitted a reimbursement request to another manufacturer or waste tire
stewardship organization under section 7615 of this title; and
(2) the manufacturer or waste tire stewardship organization does not
receive reimbursement within:
(A) 90 days after the reimbursement request, if no independent audit
is requested under section 7615 of this title; or
VT LEG #385841 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.177
2026 Page 24 of 33
(B) 60 days after completion of an audit if an independent audit is
requested under section 7615 of this title, and the audit confirms the validity of
the reimbursement request.
(c) Action against individual manufacturer.
(1) A civil action under this section may be brought against an
individual manufacturer only if the manufacturer is implementing its own
waste tire stewardship plan or the manufacturer has failed to register to
participate in a waste tire stewardship plan.
(2) A manufacturer participating in an approved waste tire stewardship
plan covering multiple manufacturers shall not be sued individually for
reimbursement.
(3) An action against a manufacturer participating in a waste tire
stewardship plan covering multiple manufacturers shall be brought against the
stewardship organization implementing the plan.
(d) Role of Agency. The Agency shall not be a party to or be required to
provide assistance or otherwise participate in a civil action authorized under
this section solely due to its regulatory requirements under this chapter, unless
subject to subpoena before a court of jurisdiction.
(e) Damages; definition. As used in this section, “damages” means the
actual, reimbursable costs a plaintiff manufacturer or waste tire stewardship
organization incurs in collecting, handling, recycling, or properly disposing of
VT LEG #385841 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.177
2026 Page 25 of 33
waste tires reasonably identified as having originated from another
manufacturer or waste tire stewardship organization.
Subchapter 4. General Provisions
§ 7618. CONFIDENTIALITY OF SUBMITTED DATA
(a) Confidentiality. The Secretary shall make the reports and data
submitted under this chapter available for public inspection and copying,
provided that:
(1) information protected under the Uniform Trade Secrets Act, as
codified under 9 V.S.A. chapter 143, or under the trade secret exemption under
1 V.S.A. § 317(c)(9) shall be exempt from public inspection and copying under
the Public Records Act; and
(2) the Secretary may publish information that is confidential under
subdivision (1) of this subsection in a summary or aggregated form that does
not directly or indirectly identify individual manufacturers, distributors, or
retailers.
(b) Omission of trade secret information. The Secretary may require, as
part of a report submitted under this chapter, that the manufacturer or waste
tire stewardship organization submit a report that does not contain trade secret
information and is available for public inspection and review.
(c) Total number of waste tires. The total number of waste tires collected
under an approved waste tire stewardship plan is not confidential business
VT LEG #385841 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.177
2026 Page 26 of 33
information under the Uniform Trade Secrets Act, as codified under 9 V.S.A.
chapter 143, and is subject to inspection and review under the Public Records
Act, 1 V.S.A. chapter 5, subchapter 3.
§ 7619. ANTITRUST; CONDUCT AUTHORIZED
(a) Activity authorized. A manufacturer, a group of manufacturers, or a
waste tire stewardship organization implementing or participating in an
approved waste tire stewardship plan under this chapter for the collection,
transport, processing, and end-of-life management of waste tires is individually
or jointly immune from liability for conduct under State laws relating to
antitrust, restraint of trade, unfair trade practices, and other regulation of trade
or commerce under 9 V.S.A. chapter 63, subchapter 1, to the extent that the
conduct is reasonably necessary to plan, implement, and comply with the
manufacturer’s, group of manufacturers’, or waste tire stewardship
organization’s chosen system for managing waste tires. This subsection shall
also apply to conduct of a retailer or wholesaler participating in a waste tire
stewardship organization’s approved waste tire stewardship plan when the
conduct is necessary to plan and implement the manufacturer’s or waste tire
stewardship organization’s collection or recycling system for waste tires.
(b) Limitations on antitrust activity. Subsection (a) of this section shall not
apply to an agreement among manufacturers, groups of manufacturers,
retailers, wholesalers, or waste tire stewardship organizations affecting the
VT LEG #385841 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.177
2026 Page 27 of 33
price of motor vehicle tires or any agreement restricting the geographic area in
which, or customers to whom, motor vehicle tires are sold.
§ 7620. FEES
(a) A manufacturer or waste tire stewardship organization shall pay
$15,000.00 annually for operation under a waste tire stewardship plan
approved by the Secretary under section 7610 of this title.
(b) The Secretary shall deposit fees collected under subsection (a) of this
section in the Environmental Permit Fund established under 3 V.S.A. § 2805.
§ 7621. RULEMAKING; PROCEDURE
The Secretary may adopt rules or procedures to implement the requirements
of this chapter.
Sec. 2. 10 V.S.A. § 8003 is amended to read:
§ 8003. APPLICABILITY
(a) The Secretary may take action under this chapter to enforce the
following statutes and rules, permits, assurances, or orders implementing the
following statutes, and the Board may take such action with respect to
subdivision (10) of this subsection:
* * *
(31) 10 V.S.A. chapter 124, relating to the trade in covered animal parts
or products;
VT LEG #385841 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.177
2026 Page 28 of 33
(32) 10 V.S.A. chapter 164B, relating to collection and management of
covered household hazardous products; and
(33) 10 V.S.A. chapter 24A relating to the Climate Superfund Cost
Recovery Program; and
(34) 10 V.S.A. chapter 169, relating to the collection and recycling of
waste tires.
* * *
Sec. 3. 10 V.S.A. § 8503 is amended to read:
§ 8503. APPLICABILITY
(a) This chapter shall govern all appeals of an act or decision of the
Secretary, excluding enforcement actions under chapters 201 and 211 of this
title and rulemaking, under the following authorities and under the rules
adopted under those authorities:
(1) The following provisions of this title:
* * *
(P) chapter 166 (collection and recycling of electronic waste);
(Q) chapter 164A (collection and disposal of mercury-containing
lamps);
* * *
VT LEG #385841 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.177
2026 Page 29 of 33
(V) chapter 124 (trade in covered animal parts or products); and
(W) chapter 164B (collection and management of covered household
hazardous products); and
(X) chapter 169 (collection and recycling of waste motor vehicle
tires).
* * *
Sec. 4. 24 V.S.A. § 2201 is amended to read:
§ 2201. THROWING, DEPOSITING, BURNING, AND DUMPING
REFUSE; PENALTY; SUMMONS AND COMPLAINT
(a)(1) Prohibition.
(1) Every person shall be responsible for proper disposal of his or her
the person’s own solid waste. A person shall not throw, dump, deposit, or
cause or permit to be thrown, dumped, or deposited any solid waste as defined
in 10 V.S.A. § 6602, refuse of whatever nature, or any noxious thing in or on
lands or waters of the State outside a solid waste management facility certified
by the Agency of Natural Resources.
(2) There shall be a rebuttable presumption that a person who is
identifiable from an examination of illegally disposed solid waste is the person
who violated a provision of this section.
(3) No person shall burn or cause to be burned in the open or incinerate
in any container, furnace, or other device any solid waste without:
VT LEG #385841 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.177
2026 Page 30 of 33
(A) first having obtained all necessary permits from the Agency of
Natural Resources, the District Environmental Commission, and the
municipality where the burning is to take place; and
(B) complying with all relevant State and local regulations and
ordinances.
(b) Prosecution of violations. A person who violates a provision of this
section commits a civil violation and shall be subject to a civil penalty of not
more than $800.00.
(1) This violation shall be enforceable in the Judicial Bureau pursuant to
the provisions of 4 V.S.A. chapter 29 in an action that may be brought by a
municipal attorney, a solid waste management district attorney, an
environmental enforcement officer employed by the Agency of Natural
Resources, a designee of the legislative body of the municipality, or any duly
authorized law enforcement officer.
(2) If the throwing, placing, or depositing was done from a snowmobile,
vessel, or motor vehicle, except a motor bus, there shall be a rebuttable
presumption that the throwing, placing, or depositing was done by the operator
of the snowmobile, vessel, or motor vehicle.
(3) Nothing in this section shall be construed as affecting the operation
of an automobile graveyard or salvage yard as defined in section 2241 of this
title, nor shall anything in this section be construed as prohibiting the
VT LEG #385841 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.177
2026 Page 31 of 33
installation and use of appropriate receptacles for solid waste provided by the
State or towns.
(c) Roadside cleanup. A person found in violation of this section may be
assigned to spend up to 80 hours collecting trash or litter from a specified
segment of roadside or from a specified area of public property.
(d) Waste tire disposal. A person shall not transfer possession of a waste
tire to an unlicensed solid waste hauler for disposal. Violation of this
subsection shall be a violation of subsection (a) of this section.
(e) Revocation of hunting, fishing, or trapping license. The Commissioner
of Fish and Wildlife shall revoke the privilege of a person found in violation of
this section from holding a hunting, fishing, or trapping license for a period of
one year from the date of the conviction, if the person fails to pay the penalty
set forth in subsection (b) of this section. The Bureau shall immediately notify
the Commissioner of Fish and Wildlife of the entry of judgment.
(f) [Repealed.]
(g) Amendment of complaint. A person authorized to enforce this section
may amend or dismiss a complaint issued by that person by marking the
complaint and returning it to the Judicial Bureau. At the hearing, a person
authorized to enforce this section may amend or dismiss a complaint issued by
that person, subject to the approval of the hearing judge.
VT LEG #385841 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.177
2026 Page 32 of 33
(h) [Repealed.]
(i) Applicability. Enforcement actions taken under this section shall in no
way preclude the Agency of Natural Resources, the Attorney General, or an
appropriate State prosecutor from initiating other or further enforcement
actions under the civil, administrative, or criminal enforcement provisions of
10 V.S.A. chapter 23, 47, 159, 201, or 211. To the extent that enforcement
under this section is by an environmental enforcement officer employed by the
Agency of Natural Resources, enforcement under this section shall preclude
other enforcement by the Agency for the same offence.
(j) Definitions. As used in this section:
(1) “Motor vehicle” shall have has the same meaning as in 23 V.S.A.
§ 4(21).
(2) “Snowmobile” shall have has the same meaning as in 23 V.S.A.
§ 3801.
(3) “Vessel” means motor boats, boats, kayaks, canoes, sailboats, and all
other types of watercraft.
(4) “Waste tire” means a motor vehicle tire that has been removed from
a motor vehicle and is no longer suitable for its original purpose because of
wear, tear, damage, defect, or another reason.
(5) “Waters” shall have has the same meaning as in 10 V.S.A.
§ 1251(13).
VT LEG #385841 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.177
2026 Page 33 of 33
Sec. 5. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #385841 v.1